Utah statutes.
78A-1-105.   Merger of district court and circuit court.
(1)  Effective July 1, 1996, the circuit court shall be merged into the
district court.  The district court shall have jurisdiction as provided by law
for the district court and shall have jurisdiction over all matters filed in
the court formerly denominated the circuit court.
(2)  The district court shall continue the judicial offices, judges, staff,
cases, authority, duties, and all other attributes of the court formerly
denominated the circuit court.
(3)  Judges of the court formerly denominated the circuit court shall:
(a)  on July 1, 1996, be judges of the district court; and
(b)  next stand for retention election at the first general election held more
than three years after their appointment or at the general election held in
the sixth year after their last retention election, as applicable.
